hyph-utf8/tex/generic/hyph-utf8/patterns/tex/hyph-la-x-classic.tex
x3í4ver
x3í4vim
x3í4vit
2xj
x2l2
2xn
x3ne
x3nĕ
xo2
3xo.
x2o3d
3xon
3xoq
xorí3t
xo4rn
xo4rq
xo3ru
xo4rv
3xos
xo4sa
xo4sn
xo4so
xo4sq
xo4su
xo4sv
x2o3t
3xo3u
3xo3v
3xō.
3x2ōn
3xōq
3xō2s
xō4sa
x2ō3t
3xōu
3xōv
xṓ4rat
xṓ4rān
xṓ4răt
xṓ4rer
xṓ4ret
xṓ4rĕr
xṓ4rĕt
x3ṓ4ro
x3ṓ4rŏ
x3ṓrs
xṓ4s
x3ṓsa
x3ṓsā
x3ṓsă
x3ṓsæ
x3ṓsǣ
x3ṓsc
x3ṓse
x3ṓsē
x3ṓsĕ
x3ṓsī
x3ṓsō
x5ṓsum
x5ṓsus
x3ṓsŭ
xŏ2
2x2ŏ3d
xŏ́2n
xó4ner
xó4rat
xó4rer
xó4ret
xó4riē
xó4ror
xó2s
xó4sa
x2ót
2xp
x3pé
2xq
x3qu
2xs2
x3sp
xs4pe
xsu4lu
xsupe3
2xt
x3ta
x3tā
x3tă
x3tá
x3tæ
x3tǣ
x3tǽ
x3te1
xter4a
xte5re
xte5ré
xteri5ue
xteri5v
xte5rī
xterī5u
xterī5v
x3tĕ
xtĕ3r4a
xtĕ3rǣ
xtĕ3rĕ
xtĕ5rī
xtĕrī5u
xtĕrī5v
xtĕ3rŭ
xtéri5t
x3ti1
x3tī
x3tĭ
x3tí
x3to
x3tō
x3tó
x3tr
x3tu
x3tū
x3tŭ
x3tú
xu2
3xu.
2x3ue.
x3uev
2x3uĕ
x2ui.
x2uis
x2uī
x2uís
3x2um
xum2e
xum2ī
xu4mn
xu4mq
xu4mv
x2une
xu1r
xu3ro
3x3us
x4us.
x4u4sn
x4u4sq
x4u4su
x4u4sv
x2uum
x2uúm
xū2b
xūbe3
x2ūne
x2ūnĕ
xū2re
xū2rē
xū2rĕ
xū2ré
xū2ri
xū2rĭ
xū2rí
xū2ro
xū2rŏ
xū2ró
x2ū2s
xū2t
xū́2b
xū́4rē
xū́4ri
xū́4rĭ
xū́4ro
xū́4rŏ
x2ū́s
xū́2t
xŭ2
2xŭā
2xŭă
x2ŭī
2xŭl
x2ŭm
xŭ3mā
xŭ3mă
xŭ3mē
xŭ3m2ĕ
xŭ3m2ī
xŭ3mŭ
2xŭō
2xŭŏ
x2ŭŭm
xŭ́4l
x2ŭ4́m
xú2b
xú2l
x2úm
x2úne
xú1r
x2úsq
xú2t
xú2ui
xú2vi
2xv
x3ve
x3vĕ
x2x2
y2a
yad2
ya1m
ya2nu
yā2nu
yá2nu
yb2
ybe2
ybē2
ybé2
ybé4i
yd2
yda3m
yde2s
ydē2
ye2
yes3
yē2
yé2
yés3
y2g3n
y2i
yi2i
yin2
yio2s
yis3
yi4sc
yis5ci
yl3ui
yl3uí
y1m
ym2a
ym2e
yme3d
yme5de
y1n
yn2ā
yne2
yn2i
yo3ne
yo3ni
yó1
yper4í
y1r
yr2a
y3rá
yr4ás
ys2i
ysta4
yste3
y1su
yte3r
yteri5ue
yteri5v
yte5rī
yterī5u
yterī5v
yx4eu
y2xu
ȳ1
ȳ2a
ȳad2
ȳ2ă
ȳăd2
ȳ2á
ȳ2i
ȳ2ĭ
ȳ2í
ȳló2
ȳmo3
ȳn2
ȳne2
ȳ3rē
ȳré2
ȳro2
ȳró2
ȳs2
ȳso2
ȳsó2
ȳ2́
ȳ́3l
ȳ́1n
ý2a1
ýb2
ýd2
ýda3
ý2g3n
ý2i
ý2l1u
ý1m
ým2e
ý1nu
ý1r
ýs2i
ýste3
ýte1
ý2th
ýx4eu
ý2xu
1z
z2a
zab2
za3r
ză3r
zá1m
ze3b
zé2ru
z2i
zmă3
zo1
zo2s
zū2
̄1
̄2a
̄a2m
̄2ā
̄2ă
̄2á
̄2ǣ
̄ǣ2ŭ
̄b2
̄be3
̄bī3u
̄bī3v
̄3bu
̄3bŭ
̄ce2
̄2cl
̄2cū
̄de3
̄dĕ3r
̄2dī
̄2e
̄2ē
̄ēn3
̄2ĕ
̄2f
̄2i
̄2ī
̄2ĭ
̄2í
̄n2
̄no3
̄2ō
̄pe3
̄per2
̄pĕ3r
̄pĕ5rĭ
̄r2
̄2s
̄to2
̄2u
̄2ŭ
̄2ú
̄2́
̄́3b2
̄́2cl
̄́3l
̄́1n
̄́2s
̆ăd2
̆b2
̆d2
̆dă3m
̆dē2
̆ĕs3
̆2gn
̆2ĭ
̆ĭ2ă
̆ĭn2
̆ĭs3
̆2lu
̆1ma
̆1mă
̆m2e
̆m2ĕ
̆1n
̆n2ā
̆1ra
̆3r2ă
̆1ræ
̆1rǣ
̆1rī
̆1rō
̆1rŏ
̆rsĭ3
̆1rŭ
̆stă4
̆tĕ5rī
̆tĕrī5u
̆tĕrī5v
̆tĕ3rŭ
̆2th
̆3thĭ
̆x2
̆2xu
̆́b2
̆́d2
̆́dă3
̆́m2ĕ
͞e1
͞ea2b3
͞eắ2
͞eá2
͞e3ác
͞e3áp
͞e3b
͞e4cue
͞e3d2
͞ed4o
͞e2eō
͞e3es
͞eé2
͞e3és
͞e3g2
͞ei2
͞e2iā
͞e3ic
͞e2iī
͞e2ī
͞e2ō
͞eó2
͞epe3
͞epote4
͞epot5er
͞epot5es
͞epo6t5és
͞epó4t5e
͞e3q
͞e3r
͞es4ca
͞es4cá
͞es4ci
͞es4cí
͞e4scu
͞e4scú
͞e4spō
͞e2sq
͞es4ta
͞es4tā
͞es4tá
͞es4te
͞es4tē
͞es4té
͞es4tin
͞esti5t4
͞es4tī
͞estí3
͞es4tít4
͞es4tō.
͞es4tōn
͞es4tōq
͞es4tōs
͞es4tōu
͞es4tōv
͞es4trú
͞e5ter
͞etere6ri
͞ete6re6rí
͞ete6r5es
͞ete6r5és
͞ete5rim
͞ete5riti
͞ete5rití
͞ete5rito
͞ete5ritó
͞ete5r6i5tur
͞ete5ritúr
͞ete4r5ī4
͞eterī́6
͞ete6rít
͞e5tĕr
͞eté6r5es
͞eté6rite
͞e3ut
͞ex2
͞e2xu
͞2u1
͞u2a
͞u2ǣ
͞u3b2
͞u3do
͞uō2
͞upe5re
͞upe5ri
͞upe5r4ī
͞uperī5n
͞uperī5q
͞uperī5u
͞uperī5v
͞u2su
͞u3sum
͞u3sus
͞u2xu
́͞2
͡e1
͡ea2b3
͡eắ2
͡e3ác
͡e3áp
͡e3b
͡e4cue
͡e3d2
͡ed4o
͡e2eo
͡e2eō
͡e2eó
͡e3es
͡eé2r
͡e3és
͡e3g2
͡ei2
͡e2iā
͡e3ic
͡e2ii
͡e2iī
͡e2ií
͡e2ī
͡e2o
͡e2ō
͡epe3
͡epo6tés
͡epó6tes
͡e3q
͡e3r
͡er4i
͡es4ca
͡es4cá
͡e5s4ci
͡es4cí
͡e4scu
͡e4scú
͡e4spō
͡e2sq
͡es4ta
͡es4tā
͡es4tá
͡es4te
͡es4tē
͡es4té
͡es4ti.
͡es4tig
͡es4tin
͡es4tiq
͡es4tis
͡esti5t4
͡es4tiv
͡es4tī
͡es4tíg
͡es4tín
͡es4tíq
͡es4tís
͡es4tí5t4
͡es4tíu
͡es4tív
͡es4to.
͡es4ton
͡es4toq
͡es4tos
͡es4tou
͡es4tov
͡es4tō.
͡es4tōn
͡es4tōq
͡es4tōs
͡es4tōu
͡es4tōv
͡es4tón
͡es4tóq
͡es4tós
͡es4tóu
͡es4tóv
͡es4trú
͡e5ter
͡etere6ri
͡ete6re6rí
͡ete4ri4
͡eter5ii
͡eter5ií
͡ete4r5ī4
͡eterī́6
͡ete4rí4
͡eter5ímu
͡eter5íti
͡e5tĕr
͡eté6ri.
͡eté6r5ii
͡eté6r5is
͡eté6rite
͡eté6ri6ti
͡e3ust
͡e3ut
͡ex2
͡e2xu
͡2u1
͡u2a
͡u3b2
͡u3do
͡uō2
͡uó2
͡upe5re
͡upe5ri
͡uperi5n
͡uperi5q
͡uperi5ue
͡uperi5v
͡upe5r4ī
͡uperī5n
͡uperī5q
͡uperī5u
͡uperī5v
͡u2xu
́͡2
́2ă
́ăd2
́ă3g
́b2a
́ba3q
́3bas
́b2ă
́4băc
́bă2r
́b3ărā
́b3ără
́b3ărē
́b3ărĕ
́b3ărō
́3băs
́b2e
́be3r
́b2ē
́b4ĭă
́bĭ4cŭ
́b4ĭēs
́2bĭĭ
́b4ĭō
́b4ĭŭ
́b2o3
́b2ŏ1
́b5ŏlĕn
́2bri
́b2rī
́b2sq
́b5s4tĕ
́b2su
́b2u
́3bŭm
́2by
́3că
́ce1
́3cē
́3ci
́cŏ3
́2cre
́2crē
́2cri
́2c3ue
́2c3u2t
́cŭ3m
́2c3ŭ2t
́dă2m
́d3ămă
́de4run
́2d3ĕ2d
́d4ĕp
́d3ĕst
́2d3i2g
́d2in
́d2ĭ
́2d3ĭg
́4d3ĭmĭ
́d3ŏ2l
́d2rē
́d2rŏ
́2d3ue
́2dū
́d2ŭ
́e2ă
́e3b
́e4cue
́e3d2
́e2eo
́e2eō
́e3es
́e3g2
́ei2
́e4ia.
́e4iam
́e4ias
́e4ia͞
́e2iā
́e2ii
́e2iī
́epe3
́e3q
́e1r
́er4i
́e3s4ca
́e3s4ci
́e3s4ta
́e5s4tā.
́e5stān
́e3s4te
́e3s4tē
́e5s4ti.
́e5s4tin
́e5s4tis
́e5stit
́e3s4tī
́e5s4to.
́e5s4tos
́e3s4tō
́es5tră
́e5stru
́es3tu
́ete3r
́etĕ5r
́e3ut
́e2ŭ
́e2x
́ĕ1
́1ĕā
́1ĕ2ă
́ĕ2mŏ
́2ĕq
́4ĕr.
́1ĕ2s
́ĕ2ŭ
́fe1
́2fē
́fĕ1
́fŏ1
́3g2a
́3gă
́3gæ
́3gǣ
́gĕ1
́2gl
́2gn
́g3no
́2gŭa
́2gŭā
́2gŭă
́2gŭǣ
́2gŭē
́2gŭĕ
́2gŭō
́2gŭŭ
́1h
́2he
́3ian
́3iaq
́3iar
́3iat
́3iau
́3iav
́i2ā
́i3b
́i2ci
́3iem
́3ien
́3ieq
́3iet
́3ieu
́3iev
́3iēs
́1ii
́1io
́3iun
́3iuu
́ĭ3b
́ĭ2cĭ
́1ĭĭ
́2ĭn2
́3ĭn.
́3lă
́2leg
́3lĕ
́4lĕg
́4lĕp
́3lix
́2lu
́3lub
́l3ue
́l3uē
́3lui
́3lum
́3lus
́1m2a
́1mă
́mă2g
́m3ără
́m3ă4rō
́m3bă
́m4bĭā
́m4b3ĭŏ
́m2e
́4mera
́4merā
́mĕ4dĭ
́4mĕdŏ
́m2in
́4minē.
́4minēn
́m2ĭ
́4mĭăn
́4mĭăt
́4mĭēn
́4mĭēs
́4mĭĕn
́4mĭĕt
́2mĭĭ
́4mĭnē.
́4mĭnēn
́4mĭŭn
́1mo1
́mŏ1
́mpĕ5r
́mpĕr6ī
́2mun
́3m2ū
́n2ā
́n2ă
́n3dĕ
́n4d3ĭg
́n4d3ŏ4l
́n4dŭĕ
́nd3ŭĭ
́n2ĕ
́n3ĕst
́n3g2
́4n3ĭcĭ
́n2o
́nŏ1
́ns2c
́n4sig
́ns5i4tæ
́ns5i4tu
́n4sĭg
́ntĕ3r
́nt5ĕrōs
́3n2ua
́n2uā
́3n2uē
́3n2uī
́n2ū
́n2ŭ
́o1
́2ŏ
́ŏ3p
́3pă
́pe1
́pe3r
́pĕ3r
́pĕ5rĭ
́3pi
́3pĭ
́3pl
́2pn
́pŏ3
́3pr
́pu3l
́3pŭī
́3pŭĭ
́1r
́r2a
́ra3g
́4r2ăb
́ră4gā
́ră4gă
́ră4gĭ
́r2ăl
́r3c
́r2e
́3rē.
́r3ĕ2d4
́rĕ2g
́rĕ2m
́r3ĕmā
́4r3ĕmă
́r3ĕmē
́r3ĕmĕ
́r3ĕmī
́r3ĕmĭ
́4r3ĕmō
́r3ĕmŏ
́r3ĕmŭ
́2r3ĕs
́2rh
́rĭ4bē
́rĭ4bĕ
́r3ĭ4cĭ
́rĭ4măn
́rĭ4măr
́rĭ4măt
́4r3ĭ4mē
́rĭ4mĕ
́4r3ĭ4mĭ
́r3ĭ4mŏ
́r5ĭ4mŭn
́3rĭŭ
́2rog
́2rŏg
́2r3ŏp
́r3ua
́r3uā
́r3uæ
́2rue
́r3uē
́r2ui
́ru3m
́r3uō
́3rū
́2sc
́s4cid
́s3cr
́s2ĕ
́s4ĕr
́3sĕŭ
́s2i
́2s3ĭ2c
́s4per
́spĕ3
́s5pĕs
́s3pī
́s3q
́s4tes
́s3tib
́3s4tin
́3stit
́5stĭtē
́5stĭtĕn
́s4trat
́s4tret
́s5tri
́3s4trŏ
́3s4tru
́s5trum
́s4trŭā
́s4trŭă
́s4trŭē
́s4trŭĕ
́s4trŭī
́s4trŭō
́s4trŭŭ
́s3ui
́3sumu
́3sun
́4tăg
́te3r
́tĕ2ī
́tĕ3ra
́t6ĕră.
́2t3ĕs
́3tha
́3thā
́3thă
́3thæ
́3thǣ
́3tĭ
́4tĭq
́2tl
́to1
́tŏ1
́5trīx
́1u
́2u1m
́2un
́uŏ1
́upe3
́upe5r
́u1r
́u2xu
́1ūn
́ŭ2
́1ŭb
́1ŭt
́vŏ1
́x2a
́x2ă
́x4eu
́x2ĕ
́x3ĕăn
́x2i
́2xia
́2xiā
́2xiæ
́2xiǣ
́2xiē
́2xiī
́2xiō
́2xiu
́x2ī
́x2ĭn
́x2o
́x2ō
́x2ŏ
́xtĕ3
́2xu
́x4us
́x2ŭĭ
́x3ŭĭs
}
